test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-norm.yaml
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gigookookohoonsimishiwaadig, gigookookohoonsimishiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gigookookohoonsimishiwaadig, gigookookohoonsimishiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gigookookohoonsimishiwaadig, gigookookohoonsimishiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonyimishiniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonyimishiniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohoonyimishiniidig, ogookookohoonyimishiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohoonyimishiniidig, ogookookohoonyimishiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohoonyimishiniidig, ogookookohoonyimishiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonyimishiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonyimishiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohoonyimishiwaadig, ogookookohoonyimishiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohoonyimishiwaadig, ogookookohoonyimishiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohoonyimishiwaadig, ogookookohoonyimishiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonsimishiniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonsimishiniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohoonsimishiniidig, ogookookohoonsimishiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohoonsimishiniidig, ogookookohoonsimishiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohoonsimishiniidig, ogookookohoonsimishiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonsimishiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonsimishiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohoonsimishiwaadig, ogookookohoonsimishiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohoonsimishiwaadig, ogookookohoonsimishiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohoonsimishiwaadig, ogookookohoonsimishiwaadog]
     
